Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.196

Cheating—Defined.

"Cheating," as used in this chapter, means to:

(1) Employ or attempt to employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud any other participant or any operator;

(2) Engage in any act, practice, or course of operation as would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any other participant or any operator;

(3) Engage in any act, practice, or course of operation while participating in a gambling activity with the intent of cheating any other participant or the operator to gain an advantage in the game over the other participant or operator; or

(4) Cause, aid, abet, or conspire with another person to cause any other person to violate subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

[ 2002 c 253 s 1; 1991 c 261 s 8; 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 13.]